Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2438YH (4) 91 jm/jh H.F. 497 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 421.72 Rounding to the nearest 1 whole dollar. 2 1. For any return a taxpayer may round to the nearest whole 3 dollar amount when entering an amount on a line on the return, 4 but in doing so the taxpayer must then round each amount 5 entered on a line on the return to the nearest whole dollar. 6 2. If a taxpayer is required to calculate two or more 7 figures together to enter an amount on a line on a return, the 8 taxpayer must include cents for each figure in the calculation 9 but may round that calculated amount to the nearest whole 10 dollar before entering that amount on a line on the return. 11 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 12 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 13 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 14 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 15 or after that date. 16